Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 6. Registration, Enforcement, and Modification of Support Order.

Sec. 25.25.601.
Registration of order for enforcement.

A support order or income withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state for enforcement.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 76 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “or support enforcement agency” following “A party” near the beginning, substituted “issued in another state or a foreign support order” for “issued by a tribunal of another state”.

Sec. 25.25.602.
Procedure to register order for enforcement.

Except as provided in AS

25.25.707

, a support order or income withholding order of another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state by sending the following records to a tribunal of this state:

a letter of transmittal to the tribunal requesting registration and enforcement;

two copies, including one certified copy, of the order to be registered, including any modification of the order;

a sworn statement by the person requesting registration or a certified statement by the custodian of the records showing the amount of any arrearage;

the name of the obligor and, if known,

the obligor’s address and social security number;

the name and address of the obligor’s employer and any other source of income of the obligor; and

a description and the location of property in this state of the obligor not exempt from execution; and

except as otherwise provided in AS

25.25.312

, the name and address of the obligee and, if applicable, the person to whom support payments are to be remitted.

On receipt of a request for registration, the registering tribunal shall file the order as an order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign support order, together with one copy of the documents and information, regardless of their form.

A complaint or comparable pleading seeking a remedy that must be affirmatively sought under other law of this state may be filed at the same time as the request for registration or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for the remedy sought.

If two or more orders are in effect, the person requesting registration shall

furnish to the tribunal a copy of every support order asserted to be in effect in addition to the documents specified in this section;

specify the order alleged to be the controlling order, if any; and

specify the amount of consolidated arrears, if any.

A request for a determination of which is the controlling order may be filed separately or with a request for registration and enforcement or for registration and modification. The person requesting registration shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 63 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 19 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 77 — 79 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the introductory language of (a), which read, “A support order or income withholding order of another state may be registered in this state by sending the following documents and information to a tribunal of this state:”, in (a)(5), inserted “except as otherwise provided in AS

25.25.312

” at the beginning, and deleted “agency or” preceding “person to whom”, and made stylistic changes; in (b), substituted “an order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign support order” for “a foreign judgment” following “shall file the order as”; added (d) and (e).

Sec. 25.25.603.
Effect of registration for enforcement.

A support order or income withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal of this state.

A registered support order issued in another state or a foreign country is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, a registered support order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 80 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “or a foreign support order” following “issued in another state”; in (b), inserted “support” following “A registered” near the beginning, and “or a foreign country” following “issued in another state”; in (c), substituted “this chapter” for “AS

25.25.601

—

25.25.612

”, and inserted “support” following “a registered”.

Sec. 25.25.604.
Choice of law.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, the law of the issuing state or foreign country governs

the nature, extent, amount, and duration of current payments under a registered support order;

the computation and payment of arrearages and accrual of interest on the arrearages under the support order; and

the existence and satisfaction of other obligations under the support order.

In a proceeding for arrears under a registered support order, the statute of limitation of this state or of the issuing state or foreign country, whichever is longer, applies.

A responding tribunal of this state shall apply the procedures and remedies of this state to enforce current support and collect arrears and interest due on a support order of another state or a foreign country registered in this state.

After a tribunal of this state or another state determines which is the controlling order and issues an order consolidating arrears, if any, a tribunal of this state shall prospectively apply the law of the state or foreign country issuing the controlling order, including its law on interest on arrears, on current and future support, and on consolidated arrears.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 81, 82 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a), which read, “The law of the issuing state governs the nature, extent, amount, and duration of current payments and other obligations of support and the payment of arrearages under the order.”; added (c) and (d).

Sec. 25.25.605.
Notice of registration of order.

When a support order or income withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered, the registering tribunal of this state shall notify the nonregistering party. The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

A notice must inform the nonregistering party

that a registered order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of this state;

that a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order must be requested within 20 days after notice unless the registered order is under AS

25.25.708

;

that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages and precludes further contest of that order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted; and

of the amount of alleged arrearages.

Upon registration of an income withholding order for enforcement, the support enforcement agency or the registering tribunal shall notify the obligor’s employer under AS 25.27.

If the registering party asserts that two or more orders are in effect, a notice must also

identify the orders, the order alleged by the registering party to be the controlling order, and the consolidated arrears, if any;

notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the controlling order;

state that the procedures provided in (b) of this section apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

state that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 64, 65 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 83, 84 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “or a foreign support order” following “issued in another state” and “of this state” following “the registering tribunal”; in (b), made a stylistic change in the introductory language, and, in (b)(2), added “unless the registered order is under AS

25.25.708

” at the end; in the introductory language in (c), inserted “the support enforcement agency or” preceding “the registering tribunal”; added (d).

Sec. 25.25.606.
Procedure to contest validity or enforcement of registered support order.

A nonregistering party seeking to contest the validity or enforcement of a registered order in this state shall request a hearing within the time required by AS

25.25.605

. The nonregistering party may seek to vacate the registration, to assert a defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order, or to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of alleged arrearages under AS

25.25.607

.

If the nonregistering party fails to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered support order in a timely manner, the order is confirmed by operation of law.

If a nonregistering party requests a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order, the registering tribunal shall schedule the matter for hearing and give notice to the parties of the date, time, and place of the hearing.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 66, 67 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 85, 86 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “the time required by AS

25.25.605

” for “20 days after the notice of the registration” following “shall request a hearing within”; in (b), substituted “registered support order” for “registered order”.

Sec. 25.25.607.
Contest of registration or enforcement.

A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a registered support order or seeking to vacate the registration has the burden of proving one or more of the following defenses:

the issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction over the contesting party;

the order was obtained by fraud;

the order has been vacated, suspended, or modified by a later order;

the issuing tribunal has stayed the order pending appeal;

there is a defense under the law of this state to the remedy sought;

full or partial payment has been made;

the statute of limitation under AS

25.25.604

precludes enforcement of some or all of the alleged arrearages; or

the alleged controlling order is not the controlling order.

If a party presents evidence establishing a full or partial defense under (a) of this section, the tribunal may stay enforcement of a registered support order, continue the proceeding to permit production of additional relevant evidence, and issue other appropriate orders. An uncontested portion of the registered support order may be enforced by all remedies available under the law of this state.

If the contesting party does not establish a defense under (a) of this section to the validity or enforcement of a registered support order, the registering tribunal shall issue an order confirming the order.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 87 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “registered support order” for “registered order”, in (a)(7), substituted “the alleged arrearages” for “the arrearages”, added (a)(8), and made a related change; in (b), twice substituted “registered support order” for “registered order” and made a stylistic change; in (c), substituted “a registered support order” for “the order”.

Sec. 25.25.608.
Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered support order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to a matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 88 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “a registered support order” for “a registered order” near the beginning.

Sec. 25.25.609.
Procedure to register child support order of another state for modification.

If a party or the child support services agency seeks to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support order issued in another state but not registered in this state, the party or agency shall register that order in this state in the same manner provided in AS

25.25.601

—

25.25.608

. A complaint for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 68 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 25.25.610.
Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of this state may enforce a child support order of another state registered for purposes of modification in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state, but the registered support order may be modified only if the requirements of AS

25.25.611

or

25.25.613

have been met.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 89 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Sec. 25.25.611.
Modification of child support order of another state.

If AS

25.25.613

does not apply, upon complaint or comparable pleading, a tribunal of this state may modify a child support order issued in another state that is registered in this state, if, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, the tribunal finds that

the following requirements are met:

neither the child, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the obligor resides in the issuing state;

a petitioner who is not a resident of this state seeks modification; and

the respondent is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state; or

this state is the residence of the child, or a party who is an individual is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal, and all of the parties who are individuals have filed consents in a record in the issuing tribunal providing that a tribunal of this state may modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Modification of a registered child support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures, and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of this state and the order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner.

A tribunal of this state may not modify any aspect of a child support order that may not be modified under the law of the issuing state, including the duration of the obligation of support. If two or more tribunals have issued child support orders for the same obligor and child, the order that is controlling and must be recognized under the provisions of AS

25.25.207

establishes the nonmodifiable aspects of the support order.

On issuance of an order by a tribunal of this state modifying a child support order issued in another state, the tribunal of this state becomes the tribunal of continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

In a proceeding to modify a child support order, the law of the state that is determined to have issued the initial controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of support. The obligor’s fulfillment of the duty of support established by that order precludes imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of this state.

Notwithstanding (a) — (e) of this section and AS

25.25.201(b)

, a tribunal of this state retains jurisdiction to modify an order issued by a tribunal of this state if

one party resides in another state; and

the other party resides outside the United States.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 69, 70, 148 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 20 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 90 — 93 ch 32 SLA 2015; am § 79 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (e) and (f) were enacted as (f) and (g); relettered in 2015 at which time a conforming change was made to the text of (f).

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section, which read, “(a) After a child support order issued in another state has been registered in this state, unless the provisions of AS

25.25.613

apply, the responding tribunal of this state may modify that order only if, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, it finds that (1) the following requirements are met:
(A) the child, the individual obligee, and the obligor do not reside in the issuing state; (B) a petitioner who is not a resident of this state seeks modification; and (C) the respondent is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state; or (2) the child, or a party who is an individual, is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal and all of the parties who are individuals have filed a written consent in the issuing tribunal providing that a tribunal of this state may modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the order; however, if the issuing state is a foreign jurisdiction that has not enacted a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter, the written consent of an individual residing in this state is not required for the tribunal to assume jurisdiction to modify the child support order. (b) Modification of a registered child support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures, and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of this state and the order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner. (c) A tribunal of this state may not modify any aspect of a child support order that may not be modified under the law of the issuing state. If two or more tribunals have issued child support orders for the same obligor and child, the order that is controlling and must be recognized under the provisions of AS

25.25.207

establishes the nonmodifiable aspects of the support order. (d) On issuance of an order modifying a child support order issued in another state, a tribunal of this state becomes the tribunal of continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.”

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a)(2) inserted a comma following the first occurrence of “tribunal”.

Sec. 25.25.612.
Recognition of order modified in another state.

If a child support order issued by a tribunal of this state is modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of this state

may enforce its order that was modified only as to arrears and interest accruing before the modification;

may provide appropriate relief for violations of its order that occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 71 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 94 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section, which read, “A tribunal of this state shall recognize a modification of its earlier child support order by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction under this chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter and, upon request, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, shall (1) enforce the order that was modified only as to amounts accruing before the modification; (2) enforce only nonmodifiable aspects of that order; (3) provide other appropriate relief only for violations of that order that occurred before the effective date of the modification; and (4) recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.”

Sec. 25.25.613.
Jurisdiction to modify support order of another state when individual parties reside in this state.

If all of the individual parties reside in this state and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state’s child support order in a proceeding to register that order.

A tribunal of this state exercising jurisdiction as provided in this section shall apply the provisions of AS

25.25.101

—

25.25.209

and

25.25.601

—

25.25.614

to the enforcement or modification proceeding. AS

25.25.301

—

25.25.507

,

25.25.702

—

25.25.714

,

25.25.801

, and

25.25.802

do not apply, and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this state.

History.

(§ 72 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 95 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “25.25.702 — 25.25.714” for “25.25.701” in the second sentence.

Sec. 25.25.614.
Notice to issuing tribunal of modification.

Within 30 days after issuance of a modified child support order, the party obtaining the modification shall file a certified copy of the order with the issuing tribunal that had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier order and with each tribunal in which the party knows that an earlier order has been registered. Failure of the party obtaining the order to file a certified copy as required subjects that party to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises, but that failure has no effect on the validity or enforceability of the modified order of the new tribunal of continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 72 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Sec. 25.25.615.
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of foreign country.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

25.25.712

, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child support order under its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal, regardless of whether the consent to modification of a child support order otherwise required of the individual under AS

25.25.611

has been given or the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country.

An order issued by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child support order under this section is the controlling order.

History.

(§ 96 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 107, ch. 32, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.

Sec. 25.25.616.
Procedure to register child support order of foreign country for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child support order not under the convention may register that order in this state under AS

25.25.601

—

25.25.608

if the order has not been registered. A complaint or comparable pleading for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or at another time. The complaint or comparable pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

History.

(§ 96 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 107, ch. 32, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.